Nebraska statutes.
Revised Statutes Supplement, 202118-622
Order; appeal; transcript; cost; standard of review.

If any railroad company is dissatisfied with an order issued as provided in section 18-621, such company may appeal such order to the district court in the county in which such city or village is situated. Such appeal shall be perfected by the railroad company filing, with the city clerk or village clerk of such city or village within ten days after such order is served, a written notice of its intention to appeal. Within twenty days after the filing of such notice of appeal, the city clerk or village clerk shall file with the clerk of the district court of such county a transcript containing the complaint and the order appealed from together with such other documents as may have been filed in such proceedings. The railroad company appealing shall pay to the city clerk or village clerk the cost of preparing such transcript. Upon such appeal the district court, without jury, shall hear and determine de novo all of the issues determined by the governing body except the question of whether or not the construction of such viaduct or subway is necessary for the public safety, convenience, and welfare. The court shall hear and determine such an appeal promptly and speedily, and the court's decision shall be subject to review by appeal or otherwise as other judgments of the district court are reviewable.

Laws 1949, c. 28, § 4(3), p. 105;

Laws 2021, LB163, § 57.